Utah statutes.
76-10-1509.   Obstructing operation of bus.

Any person who unlawfully obstructs or impedes by force or violence, or any means of intimidation, the regular operation of a bus is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 1979 General Session

